Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNEAPOLIS-ST. PAUL INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT; SALES TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, repair, maintenance, or improvement of public infrastructure at the Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport purchased by a contractor or subcontractor are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, if materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after June 30, 2023, and before January 1, 2028. No refunds may be paid before July 1, 2025. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2023, and before January 1, 2028. new text end